src/scripts/Polish/unicodechars.foma
%🇭 -> %🇭 || _ ,,
%🇮 -> %🇮 || _ ,,
%🇯 -> %🇯 || _ ,,
%🇰 -> %🇰 || _ ,,
%🇱 -> %🇱 || _ ,,
%🇲 -> %🇲 || _ ,,
%🇳 -> %🇳 || _ ,,
%🇴 -> %🇴 || _ ,,
%🇵 -> %🇵 || _ ,,
%🇶 -> %🇶 || _ ,,
%🇷 -> %🇷 || _ ,,
%🇸 -> %🇸 || _ ,,
%🇹 -> %🇹 || _ ,,
%🇺 -> %🇺 || _ ,,
%🇻 -> %🇻 || _ ,,
%🇼 -> %🇼 || _ ,,
%🇽 -> %🇽 || _ ,,
%🇾 -> %🇾 || _ ,,
%🇿 -> %🇿 || _ ;
